Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2553.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "computer," "consumer," "covered device," "manufacturer," "market share" and "obligated share" in section 102 of the act of November 23, 2010 (P.L.1083, No.108), known as the Covered Device Recycling Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 102. Definitions.123456789101112131415161718192021 The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Computer." A desktop or notebook computer. The term does not include an automated typewriter, professional workstation, server, [mobile telephone,] portable handheld calculator, portable digital assistant, MP3 player or other similar device. * * *"Consumer." An occupant of a single detached dwelling unit or a single unit of a multiple dwelling unit who has used a covered device primarily for personal or small business use or political subdivision business use. For purposes of this definition, a small business is an entity that is independently owned or operated, employs [50] 100 or fewer people, has purchased or leased a covered computer device from a computer manufacturer or retailer and, but for the program established under this act, would not otherwise have access to electronic recycling programs.* * *"Covered device." A covered computer device [and], covered television device, covered personal electronic device and covered networking equipment marketed and intended for use by a consumer. The term does not include:(1) a device that is a part of a motor vehicle or any component part of a motor vehicle assembled by or for a vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including replacement parts for use in a motor vehicle;(2) a device that is functionally or physically a part of or connected to or integrated within equipment or a system 20260HB2553PN3650 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designed and intended for use in an industrial, governmental, commercial, research and development or medical setting, including, but not limited to, diagnostic, monitoring, control or medical products as defined under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (52 Stat. 1040, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), or equipment used for security, sensing, monitoring, antiterrorism, emergency services purposes or equipment designed and intended primarily for use by professional users;(3) a device that is contained within a clothes washer, clothes dryer, refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer, microwave oven, conventional oven or range, dishwasher, room air conditioner, dehumidifier, air purifier or exercise equipment; or(4) any of the following:(i) [Telephone of any type, including a mobile phone] Landline telephone.(ii) Personal digital assistant.(iii) Global positioning system."Covered networking equipment." A physical device used to connect another device within a computer network, enabling data transmission and communication between devices, including an Internet router, modem, wireless access point and switch."Covered personal electronic device." Any of the following:(1) Smartphone.(2) Tablet.(3) Smart watch.(4) E-reader.(5) Wireless ear buds or headphones.(6) Printer.20260HB2553PN3650 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Fax machine.(8) Data bearing wearable consumer device.* * *"Manufacturer." A [computer manufacturer or a television] covered device manufacturer."Market share." An estimate of the total [weight of a] manufacturer's sales of covered devices during the previous program year calculated by multiplying the [weight] estimated sales of its covered devices sold nationally times the quotient of this Commonwealth's population divided by the national population."Market share obligation." As determined under section 305.* * *["Obligated share." The proportion of covered devices that reflects a manufacturer's market share responsibility under this act.]* * *Section 2. Section 302(b) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 302. Sales prohibition.* * *(b) List to be maintained by department.--No later than six months after the effective date of this section, the department shall maintain a list of each registered manufacturer, the brands of all covered devices reported in each manufacturer's registration and the brands of covered devices for which no manufacturer has registered and post the list on the department's Internet website. The following shall apply:(1) No manufacturer or retailer may sell or offer for sale in this Commonwealth a covered device if the brand is 20260HB2553PN3650 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 included on the sales prohibition list.(2) Manufacturers on the sales prohibition list can be removed from the list, allowing sales of new covered devices to consumers in the Commonwealth to resume, if:(i) The department determines that all manufacturer registration requirements in section 304 have been met.(ii) Any additional actions that are needed to resolve each outstanding violation have been taken.* * *(d) Enforcement.--Manufacturers who are not listed on the department's list of registered manufacturers shall be notified by the department and given 30 days to reply to the department for purposes of compliance with this act. The following shall apply:(1) If the manufacturer fails to respond to the department, the department shall notify retailers offering the manufacturer's covered devices for sale to consumers in this Commonwealth of the manufacturer's inclusion on the sales prohibition list.(2) Notice of the manufacturer's inclusion on the sales prohibition list, as described under subsection (b), shall be provided to relevant trade associations and industry groups.Section 3. Section 304(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 304. Registration.(a) Manufacturers registration.--(1) A manufacturer of new covered devices offered for sale in this Commonwealth, including sales made online, shall register with the department by January 30, 2011, or six months after the effective date of this section, whichever is later, and pay a registration fee of $5,000.20260HB2553PN3650 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) After January 30, 2011, or six months after the effective date of this section, whichever is later, if a manufacturer has not previously filed a registration, the manufacturer shall file a registration with the department prior to any offer for sale or delivery in this Commonwealth, including sales made online, of the manufacturer's new covered devices and shall pay to the department a registration fee of $5,000.(3) A registered manufacturer shall submit an annual renewal of its registration to the department and pay to the department a registration fee [of $5,000 by January 1] under paragraph (5) by August 31 of each program year. The registration and each annual renewal shall include a list of all brands the manufacturer is using on its covered devices regardless of whether the manufacturer owns or licenses the brand and shall be effective upon receipt by the department.(4) Shall A MANUFACTURER SHALL report to the department the total weight of its covered devices sold to consumers during the calendar year two years prior, calculated by multiplying the weight of its covered devices sold nationally times the quotient of this Commonwealth's population divided by the national population.(5) A manufacturer shall be assessed the following annual registration fee:(i) Manufacturers with reported annual sales weight greater than or equal to 100,000 pounds shall be assessed a registration fee of $10,000.(ii) Manufacturers with reported annual sales weight less than 100,000 pounds and greater than or equal to 10,000 pounds shall be assessed a registration fee of 20260HB2553PN3650 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $5,000.(iii) Manufacturers with reported annual sales weight less than 10,000 pounds and greater than or equal to 5,000 pounds shall be assessed a registration fee of $1,000.(iv) Manufacturers with reported annual sales weight less than 5,000 pounds and greater than or equal to 100 pounds shall be assessed a registration fee of $500.(v) Manufacturers with reported annual sales weight less than 100 pounds and greater than or equal to 1 pound shall be assessed a registration fee of $100.* * *Section 4. Section 305(a)(1), (b)(4) and (6), (c)(2), (d), (f)(1)(i) and (ii) and (g) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 305. Manufacturer plan and reporting.(a) Collection, transportation and recycling plan.--(1) A manufacturer shall establish, conduct and manage a plan to collect, transport and recycle a quantity of covered devices equal to the manufacturer's market share. The plan shall be submitted to the department for review by August 31.* * *(a.1) Market share.--The market share and market share obligation determination shall be in accordance with the following:(1) For each program year, the department shall determine the market share of each manufacturer for covered devices.(2) The department shall calculate a manufacturer's market share for a program year by:20260HB2553PN3650 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) using the total weight of the manufacturer's covered devices sold nationally to consumers for the calendar year two years prior as reported to the department under section 304; and(ii) multiplying the weight under subparagraph (i) by the quotient of this Commonwealth's population divided by the national population for that year; and(iii) dividing the result in subparagraph (ii) by the sum of the results for all manufacturers for the same covered device or covered device category.(3) The department shall determine each manufacturer's market share obligation for each program year for covered devices by multiplying:(i) the manufacturer's market share as determined under paragraph (2); by(ii) the total weight, in pounds, of covered electronic devices collected from consumers in this Commonwealth in the previous program year as determined by the department; and(iii) any adjustment factor adopted by the department to reflect the amount of covered electronic devices reasonably expected to be collected in the next program year, based upon actual collection amounts in preceding program years.(4) A manufacturer shall be notified annually by the department of the manufacturer's market share and market share obligation for each program year and covered device.(5) If a manufacturer fails to submit complete and accurate national sales data required under section 304(a)(4), or if the department determines that the data is 20260HB2553PN3650 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unavailable or unusable, the department may estimate that manufacturer's national sales and market share using one or more of the following sources, as appropriate:(i) National or regional market research reports issued by recognized independent firms.(ii) Federal or State statistical publications.(iii) Publicly reported manufacturer or retailer sales or shipment data.(iv) Any other credible and reasonably objective data source identified by the department by order or guidance.(6) Market share and market share obligation determinations made by the department under this subsection shall be based on data treated as confidential to the extent permitted by law. Only the resulting market share percentages and market share obligations shall be public records.(b) Contents of plan.--The plan required under subsection (a) shall include:* * *(4) The intention of the manufacturer or each manufacturer to fulfill its [obligated share] market share obligation under this act, through operation of its own program, either individually or with other manufacturers as a group.* * *(6) For an initial plan submitted by a manufacturer or group of manufacturers, an estimate of the [weight] market share and market share obligation of covered devices to be collected during the first program year. The plan shall also include information demonstrating the process by which the 20260HB2553PN3650 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufacturer or group of manufacturers will increase the collection of the number of covered devices by a minimum of 2% [by weight] per year beginning with the second full program year.(c) Reporting by manufacturers.--* * *(2) When a manufacturer or group of manufacturers conducts its own collection, transportation and recycling program for covered devices, the manufacturer or group of manufacturers shall submit a report to the department annually by January 30, beginning the year after the program is initiated. The report shall consist of the total weight and estimated number of covered devices collected from consumers in this Commonwealth by the manufacturer or group of manufacturers during the previous year and documentation verifying collection and recycling of the devices.(d) Sales data.--National sales data submitted by a manufacturer to the department to fulfill its market share obligations under this act shall be exempt from disclosure under the provisions of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, and shall not be disclosed by the department unless otherwise required by law or court order.* * *(f) Effect of failure to comply with approved plan.--(1) (i) If the total weight in pounds of covered devices collected, transported and recycled during a program year by a manufacturer or group of manufacturers is less than the sum of the [obligated shares in weight] market share obligations for that program year of each manufacturer participating in the plan, the manufacturer 20260HB2553PN3650 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or group of manufacturers shall submit to the department by March 15 of the following program year a payment to cover the cost of collecting, transporting and recycling the unmet portion of the sum of the [obligated shares in weight] market share obligation.(ii) The payment shall be [equal to the quantity of the unmet portion, in pounds, plus an additional 10% of such quantity, multiplied by the cost per pound for collection, transportation and recycling of covered devices] $2 per pound.* * *(g) Multiple manufacturers.--(1) Where more than one person may be deemed the manufacturer of a brand of a covered device, any one or more such persons may assume responsibility for and satisfy the market share obligations of a manufacturer under this act with respect to covered devices bearing that brand.(2) In the event that no person assumes responsibility for and satisfies the market share obligations of a manufacturer under this act with respect to covered devices bearing that brand, for purposes of compliance with these provisions, the responsible party shall be the person who satisfies paragraph (1) of the definition of manufacturer.* * *(i) Recyclers recordkeeping.--In addition to any other reporting requirements, a recycler handling covered devices under this act shall also keep detailed and certified records of the weights of covered devices handled. The records may be requested by the department at any time.Section 5. Section 501(1) of the act is amended and the 20260HB2553PN3650 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 501. Duties of department.The department shall:(1) Encourage the use of existing collection and consolidation infrastructure for handling covered devices to the extent that this infrastructure is accessible on a regular and ongoing basis to [at least 85%] 100% of the population of this Commonwealth, is cost effective and meets the environmentally sound management requirements of section 506.* * *(6) Establish a goal for collections weight annually.(7) Maintain an active list of approved recyclers that have been issued a permit by the department for processing of waste electronics. The list shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall be updated as soon as permits are issued or expire.(8) Create an online portal or website to inform a covered entity of the covered entity's responsibilities under this act.Section 6. Sections 502(1) and (2) and 507(a)(1) and (c) of the act are amended to read:Section 502. Annual report.The department shall prepare and submit annually to the General Assembly and post on its Internet website a report that includes:(1) The total weight and estimated number of covered devices collected in this Commonwealth during the previous calendar year.(2) A complete listing of all manufacturers' collection, 20260HB2553PN3650 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transportation and recycling programs and collection sites operating in this Commonwealth during the prior calendar year[,] and the parties that operated them [and the amount of material by weight collected at each site].* * *Section 507. Enforcement.(a) Judicial action.--(1) The Commonwealth, through the [Attorney General and the] department, may initiate independent action to enforce any provision of this act, including failure by the manufacturer to submit a plan as required in section 305 or to remit the registration fee pursuant to section 304(a) to the department.* * *(c) Injunctive relief.--A violation of the sales prohibitions of this act may be enjoined in an action in the name of the Commonwealth, brought by the [Attorney General] department.Section 7. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment of section 501(1) of the act shall take effect December 31, 2031.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 12 months.20260HB2553PN3650 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324